Utah statutes.
19-1-506.   Preemption.

With respect to a retail container containing less than 55 gallons of engine coolant, a political subdivision of this state may not establish or enforce a prohibition, limitation, standard, or other requirement relating to the inclusion of a bittering agent in an engine coolant that differs from, or is in addition to, a requirement under this part.

